Wisconsin, session 2025, AB485.
do enact as follows:AB485,15Section 1. 118.60 (3) (e) of the statutes is created to read:AB485,2,51118.60 (3) (e) For a pupil who attended a participating private school under 2this section in a school year and applies to attend a participating private school 3under this section in the following school year, the department may not require 4documentation to verify the pupil’s residence unless the pupil’s residence has 5changed since the pupil’s residence was last verified using documentation.AB485,26Section 2. 119.23 (3) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB485,2,117119.23 (3) (c) For a pupil who attended a participating private school under 8this section in a school year and applies to attend a participating private school 9under this section in the following school year, the department may not require 10documentation to verify the pupil’s residence unless the pupil’s residence has 11changed since the pupil’s residence was last verified using documentation.AB485,312Section 3. PI 35.05 (2) of the administrative code is amended to read:AB485,2,2313PI 35.05 (2) Residency eligibility. A school shall obtain one of the residency 14documents specified by the department from an applicant’s parent that shows the 15applicant resides at the address on the application at the time of application. The 16residency document shall be dated no earlier than 3 months prior to the start of the 17open application period in which an applicant applies. If a school receives a lease 18agreement as a residency document, the lease term shall include the date the 19application was received. The document shall contain the parent name and match 20the address on the application. This subsection does not apply to an applicant who 21attended a school under the choice program and who applies to attend a school in 22the choice program in the following school year unless the applicant’s residence has 23changed since the applicant’s residence was last verified under this subsection.AB485,41Section 4. PI 35.05 (3) of the administrative code is renumbered PI 35.05 (3) 2(a) and amended to read:AB485,3,73PI 35.05 (3) (a) A For an applicant who is required to submit documentation 4under sub. (2), a school shall verify that the address on a pupil’s application is in the 5city of Milwaukee by using the city of Milwaukee assessor website, the state of 6Wisconsin’s Statewide Voter Registration System or any other source permitted by 7the department.AB485,58Section 5. PI 35.05 (3) (b) of the administrative code is created to read:AB485,3,119PI 35.05 (3) (b) For an applicant who is not required to submit documentation 10under sub. (2), a school may use the verification process under par. (a) to verify the 11applicant’s current address as listed on the application.AB485,612Section 6. PI 48.05 (2) of the administrative code is amended to read:AB485,3,2313PI 48.05 (2) Residency eligibility. A school shall obtain one of the residency 14documents specified by the department from an applicant’s parent that shows the 15applicant resides at the address on the application at the time of application. The 16residency document shall be dated no earlier than 3 months prior to the start of the 17open application period in which an applicant applies. If a school receives a lease 18agreement as a residency document, the lease term shall include the date the 19application was received. The document shall contain the parent name and match 20the address on the application. This subsection does not apply to an applicant who 21attended a school under a choice program and who applies to attend a school in a 22choice program in the following school year unless the applicant’s residence has 23changed since the applicant’s residence was last verified under this subsection.AB485,71Section 7. PI 48.05 (3) of the administrative code is renumbered PI 48.05 (3) 2(am), and PI 48.05 (3) (am) (intro.), as renumbered, is amended to read:AB485,4,53PI 48.05 (3) (am) (intro.) A For an applicant who is required to submit 4documentation under sub. (2), a school shall verify an the applicant’s address listed 5on the residency documentation under sub. (2) as follows:AB485,86Section 8. PI 48.05 (3) (bm) of the administrative code is created to read:AB485,4,97PI 48.05 (3) (bm) For an applicant who is not required to submit 8documentation under sub. (2), a school may use the verification process under par. 9(am) to verify the applicant’s current address as listed on the application.AB485,910Section 9. Initial applicability.AB485,4,1211(1) This act first applies to applications submitted to attend a private school 12participating in a parental choice program in the 2026-27 school year.AB485,4,1313